New York, session 2025-2026, A8602.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to 4 "Victor Topaller". All that portion of the state highway system consti- 5 tuting state route 908H in the county of Kings, beginning at its inter- 6 section with Surf Avenue and terminating at its intersection with 7 Neptune Avenue, shall be dedicated to "Victor Topaller". 8 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 9 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 10 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act. However, to avoid 11 confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the dedi- 12 cation called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one of 13 ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 14 changed as a result of this act. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13193-01-5